src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON мо_[п_a1-]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a2]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a[1]]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_as]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_as~]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_as~x]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_ax]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a~]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_b]
+N+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_End_anim ;
+N+Msc: Pl_SubstAdj_End_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[п_b/c']
мо_[п_b] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_b/c]
мо_[п_b] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_b?]
мо_[п_b] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_b?~]
мо_[п_b] ;

LEXICON MSgStem !Inanimate
MSgNomZ ;
MSgAccZ ;
MSgObliqStem ;

LEXICON MSgStem_Fac !Inanimate
MSgNomZ_Fac ;
MSgAccZ_Fac ;
MSgObliqStem_Fac ;

LEXICON MSgStem_ObliquePrb !Inanimate
MSgNomZ ;
MSgAccZ ;
MSgObliqStem_Prb ;

LEXICON MSgStem3 !Inanimate
MSgNomZ ;
MSgAccZ ;
MSgObliqStem3 ;

LEXICON MSgStem_anim
MSgNomZ_anim ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
MSgObliqStem_anim ;

LEXICON MSgStem_anim_Fac
MSgNomZ_anim_Fac ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc+Fac:%>а # ;
MSgObliqStem_anim_Fac ;

LEXICON MSgStem_anim_Elid
MSgNomZ_anim_Elid ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc+Elid:%>а # ;
MSgObliqStem_anim_Elid ;

LEXICON MSgEnd !Inanimate
MSgNomZ ;
MSgAccZ ;
MSgObliqEnd ;

LEXICON MSgEnd3 !Inanimate
MSgNomZ ;
MSgAccZ ;
MSgObliqEnd3 ;

LEXICON MSgEnd_ObliquePrb !Inanimate
MSgNomZ ;
MSgAccZ ;
MSgObliqEnd_Prb ;

LEXICON MSgEnd_anim
MSgNomZ_anim ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а́ # ;
MSgObliqEnd_anim ;

LEXICON MSgNomZ
+Inan+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON MSgNomZ_Fac
+Inan+Sg+Nom+Fac: # ;

LEXICON MSgNomZ_anim
+Anim+Sg+Nom: # ;

LEXICON MSgNomZ_anim_Fac
+Anim+Sg+Nom+Fac: # ;

LEXICON MSgNomZ_anim_Elid
+Anim+Sg+Nom+Elid: # ;

! LEXICON MSgAccZ
! +Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;

! LEXICON MSgAccZ_Fac
! +Inan+Sg+Acc+Fac: # ;

! LEXICON MSgAccZ_anim
! +Anim+Sg+Acc: # ;

! LEXICON MscGen2_inan
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Gen2:%>у # ;

! LEXICON MscLoc2_inan
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc2:%>у́ # ;

! LEXICON MscLoc2_inan_Fac
! +N+Msc+Inan+Sg+Loc2+Fac:%>у́ # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqStem
! +Inan+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc:%>е # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins:%>ом # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqStem_Fac
! +Inan+Sg+Gen+Fac:%>а # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>е # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat+Fac:%>у # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ом # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqStem_Prb
! +Inan+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>а # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>е # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>у # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>ом # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqStem3
! +Inan+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>е # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc:%>%^Gе # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins:%>ом # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqStem_anim
! +Anim+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Loc:%>е # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Ins:%>ом # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqStem_anim_Fac
! +Anim+Sg+Gen+Fac:%>а # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>е # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Dat+Fac:%>у # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>ом # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqStem_anim_Elid
! +Anim+Sg+Gen+Elid:%>а # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Loc+Elid:%>е # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Dat+Elid:%>у # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Ins+Elid:%>ом # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqEnd
! +Inan+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins:%>о́м # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqEnd_Prb
! +Inan+Sg+Gen+Prb:%>а́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc+Prb:%>е́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat+Prb:%>у́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins+Prb:%>о́м # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqEnd3
! +Inan+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>е́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc:%>%^Gе́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins:%>о́м # ;

! LEXICON MSgObliqEnd_anim
! +Anim+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Ins:%>о́м # ;

LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_Stem
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>ый # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>ый # ;
+Inan: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique ;

LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>ый # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
+Anim: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique ;

LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>ыйся # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>огося # ;
+Anim: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique_R ;

LEXICON NSg_SubstAdj_Stem
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>ое # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>ое # ;
+Inan: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique ;

LEXICON NSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>ое # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ое # ;
+Anim: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique ;

LEXICON NSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>оеся # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>оеся # ;
+Anim: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique_R ;

! LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique
! +Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

! LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique_R
! +Sg+Gen:%>огося # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>омся # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>омуся # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ымся # ;

LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_End
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>о́й # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>о́й # ;
+Inan: MSg_SubstAdj_End_Oblique ;

LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_End_anim
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>о́й # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>о́го # ;
+Anim: MSg_SubstAdj_End_Oblique ;

LEXICON NSg_SubstAdj_End
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>о́е # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>о́е # ;
+Inan: MSg_SubstAdj_End_Oblique ;

LEXICON NSg_SubstAdj_End_anim
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>о́е # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>о́е # ;
+Anim: MSg_SubstAdj_End_Oblique ;

! LEXICON MSg_SubstAdj_End_Oblique
! +Sg+Gen:%>о́го # ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
! +Sg+Dat:%>о́му # ;
! +Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;

LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_Stem
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ые # ;
+Inan: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique ;

LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
+Anim: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique ;

LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ыхся # ;
+Anim: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique_R ;

LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_Prb
! +Anim+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ых # ;
+Anim: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique_Prb ;

! LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique
! +Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

! LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique_R
! +Pl+Nom:%>ыеся # ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ыхся # ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>ыхся # ;
! +Pl+Dat:%>ымся # ;
! +Pl+Ins:%>ымися # ;

! LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_Oblique_Prb
! +Pl+Nom+Prb:%>ые # ;
! +Pl+Gen+Prb:%>ых # ;
! +Pl+Loc+Prb:%>ых # ;
! +Pl+Dat+Prb:%>ым # ;
! +Pl+Ins+Prb:%>ыми # ;

! LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_End
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́е # ;
+Inan: Pl_SubstAdj_End_Oblique ;

! LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_End_anim
! +Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
+Anim: Pl_SubstAdj_End_Oblique ;

! LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_End_Oblique
! +Pl+Nom:%>ы́е # ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
! +Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
! +Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

! LEXICON Pl_SubstAdj_End_Oblique_R
! +Pl+Nom:%>ы́еся # ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>ы́хся # ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>ы́хся # ;
! +Pl+Dat:%>ы́мся # ;
! +Pl+Ins:%>ы́мися # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!NEUTER PARADIGMS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON с_0
+N+Neu: Indecl_Sg_inan ;
+N+Neu: Indecl_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON с_0.sent
+N+Neu: Indecl_Sg_inan.sent ;
+N+Neu: Indecl_Pl_inan.sent ;

LEXICON Letter
с_0 ;
с_0.sent ;

LEXICON Time_halfhour ! e.g. полпервого
+N+Neu: Indecl_Sg_inan ;

LEXICON с_полымя
+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:я # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:я # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:ем # ;

LEXICON с_a
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON соб-с_a
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Neu: аPlStem ;

LEXICON соб-с_a-
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Neu: аPlStem_Prb ;

LEXICON с_a_w/GPl_ей
с_a ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ей # ;

LEXICON с_a_Р._мн._затрудн.
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_gPrb ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_a_JPl
+N+Neu:о NSgStem ;
+N+Neu:%^Fей аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_a_о_и
+N+Neu:о NSgStem ;
+N+Neu:ь ыPlStem ;

LEXICON с_a_дерево
+N+Neu:де́рево NSgStem ;
+N+Neu:дере́в%^Fей аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_a_озеро
+N+Neu:о́зеро NSgStem ;
+N+Neu:озёро аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_a_утро
с_a ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen+PObj:%>а́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat+PObj:%>у́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat+PObj:%>а́м # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins+PObj:%>а́ми # ; ! TODO FIX This tag is wrong. утра́ми is (only?) used without a preposition.

LEXICON мн._[с_a]
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON соб-мн._[с_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Neu: аPlStem ;

LEXICON с_a1
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON с_a[1]
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
+N+Neu: ыPlNomStem_Fac ;
+N+Neu: ыPlAccStem_Fac ;

LEXICON с_a12
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: ыPlStem_ов ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_a2
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_ов ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_a[2]
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов%^G # ;
