src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
белила:бели́ло мн._[с_a] "weight: 3.39901696895054" ;
кросна:кро́с%^Fено мн._[с_a] ;
тенёта:тенёто мн._[с_a] ;
воротища:воро́тище мн._[с_a] ;
капвложения:ка̀пвложе́ние мн._[с_a] ;
вахтенный:ва́хтен%^Fен мо_[п_a1-] ;
подвахтенный:подва́хтен%^Fен мо_[п_a1-] ;
помешанный:поме́шан%^Fен мо_[п_a2] ;
подследственный:подсле́дствен%^Fен мо_[п_a[1]] "weight: 3.65534806115437" ;
певчий:пе́вч мо_[п_as] ;
погибший:поги́бш мо_[п_as] ;
почивший:почи́вш мо_[п_as] ;
сумасшедший:сумасше́дш мо_[п_as] ;
умерший:уме́рш мо_[п_as] "weight: 3.6999422481187483" ;
политический:полити́ческ мо_[п_as~] ;
полицейский:полице́йск мо_[п_as~] "weight: 3.90982279213314" ;
статский:ста́тск мо_[п_as~] ;
флотский:фло́тск мо_[п_as~] ;
большенький:бо́льшень%^Fек мо_[п_as~] ;
новенький:но́вень%^Fек мо_[п_as~x] "weight: 3.6722663310474175" ;
контуженый:конту́жен мо_[п_ax] ;
ряженый:ря́жен мо_[п_ax] ;
раненый:ра́нен мо_[п_ax] "weight: 3.913011766994102" ;
крещёный:крещён мо_[п_ax] ;
некрещёный:некрещён мо_[п_ax] ;
ультраправый:у̀льтрапра́в мо_[п_a~] ;
ультралевый:у̀льтрале́в мо_[п_a~] ;
косой:кос мо_[п_b/c'] "weight: 3.2474040540085505" ;
глухой:глух мо_[п_b/c'] "weight: 3.448027210100422" ;
кривой:крив мо_[п_b/c] "weight: 3.1067543982673835" ;
немой:нем мо_[п_b/c] "weight: 3.2474040540085505" ;
хромой:хром мо_[п_b/c] "weight: 3.2474040540085505" ;
слепой:слеп мо_[п_b/c] "weight: 3.649558940047992" ;
святой:свят мо_[п_b/c] "weight: 4.147773790931577" ;
цирковой:цирков мо_[п_b?] ;
звеновой:звенов мо_[п_b?] ;
верховой:верхов мо_[п_b?] ;
невыездной:невыездн мо_[п_b?] ;
водяной:водян мо_[п_b?] "weight: 3.29165807722818" ;
заводской:заводск мо_[п_b?~] ;
городской:городск мо_[п_b?~] "weight: 4.182153260564352" ;
ковшевой:ковшев мо_[п_b] ;
кордовой:кордов мо_[п_b] ;
копровой:копров мо_[п_b] ;
плитовой:плитов мо_[п_b] ;
портной:портн мо_[п_b] "weight: 4.057985200719383" ;
д:д Letter ;
з:з Letter ;
л:л Letter ;
п:п Letter ;
ч:ч Letter ;
я:я́ Letter ;
промилле:проми́лле с_0 ;
це:це́ с_0 ;
джерси:дже́рси́ с_0 "weight: 3.278164074126468" ;
гало:гало́ с_0 ;
эсперанто:эспера́нто с_0 ;
маскирование:маскирова́ние с_a ;
грехопадение:грехопаде́ние с_a ;
настроение:настрое́ние с_a "weight: 4.924555270230316" ;
великодушие:великоду́шие с_a "weight: 3.4850270336731057" ;
невольничество:нево́льничество с_a ;
вече:ве́че с_a_w/GPl_ей ;
иго:и́го с_a_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 3.4676599491383264" ;
эхо:э́хо с_a_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 4.921086537446076" ;
радиоэхо:ра̀диоэ́хо с_a_Р._мн._затрудн. ;
держидерево:держѝ с_a_дерево ;
дерево: с_a_дерево "weight: 5.350507208272098" ; ! [поэтич._также_с_1c]
колено:коле́н с_a_о_и "weight: 5.210017115423064" ;
колено:коле́н с_a_JPl "weight: 5.210017115423064" ;
озеро: с_a_озеро "weight: 4.871588490837805" ;
полено:поле́н с_a_JPl "weight: 4.071428211818889" ;
шило:ши́л с_a_JPl "weight: 3.875998596064176" ;
утро:у́тро с_a_утро "weight: 5.59941083299951" ;
крылечко:крыле́ч%^Fеко с_a1 "weight: 3.74508338472869" ;
утречко:у́треч%^Fеко с_a1 "weight: 3.2324373153488297" ;
золотишко:золоти́ш%^Fеко с_a1 "weight: 3.148725697149633" ;
крылышко:кры́лыш%^Fеко с_a1 "weight: 3.938214075495061" ;
брюхо:брю́хо с_a1 "weight: 4.385832659962407" ;
древко:дре́в%^Fоко с_a12 "weight: 3.5345811962049494" ;
колёсико:колёсико с_a12 ;
плечико:пле́чико с_a12 "weight: 3.7588930794148547" ;
личико:ли́чико с_a12 "weight: 4.06475871802064" ;
дреколье:дреко́л%^Fийе с_a2 ;
подстолье:подсто́л%^Fийе с_a2 ;
отрепье:отре́п%^Fийе с_a2 ;
окосье:око́с%^Fийе с_a2 ;
предустье:преду́ст%^Fийе с_a2 ;
жвало:жва́ло с_a[1] ;
веретёнце:веретён%^Fеце с_a[2] ;
ведёрце:ведёр%^Fеце с_a[2] ;
щупальце:щу́паль%^Fеце с_a[2] "weight: 3.7497355784718573" ;
рыльце:ры́ль%^Fеце с_a[2] "weight: 3.184168788029196" ;
полымя:по́лым с_полымя ;
рай-дерево:ра̀й- с_a_дерево ;
негной-дерево:негно̀й- с_a_дерево ;
полседьмого:по̀лседьмо́го Time_halfhour ;
полвторого:по̀лвторо́го Time_halfhour ;
пол-одиннадцатого:по̀л-оди́ннадцатого Time_halfhour ;
полшестого:по̀лшесто́го Time_halfhour ;
полпятого:по̀лпя́того Time_halfhour ;
